Illinois, session 104th, SB4079.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $4,500,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the Supreme Court Historic 6Preservation Fund to the Supreme Court Historic Preservation 7Commission for Historic Preservation purposes.  8    Section 10. The sum of $900,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 10the Supreme Court Historic Preservation Commission for deposit 11into the Supreme Court Historic Preservation Fund. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.